Connecticut, session 2026, SB00170.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
four hundred thousand dollars, the proceeds of which shall be used by
the Department of Economic and Community Development for the
purpose of providing a grant-in-aid to the American Legion Post 85 in
the town of Sprague for the completion of recreational fields and
meeting areas.